Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 7 Competitive Emerging Communications Technologies

Effective date. —

This article became effective April 28, 2006.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, Article 6, as enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 641, § 2/SB 120, was redesignated as Article 7, and Article 6 as enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 682, was redesignated as Article 8.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 641, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds:

“(1) That it is in the public interest to encourage deployment of the emerging communications technologies of broadband service, voice over Internet protocol, and wireless service by expressly removing any power the Georgia Public Service Commission may have to set the rates and the terms and conditions for the offering of such services within Georgia;

“(2) That market based competition is the best mechanism for the selection and setting of such rates, terms, and conditions for such emerging communications technologies and to encourage the adoption and use of such services by Georgia consumers; and

“(3) That Georgia’s consumers need timely and accurate information as to the actual cost and levels of delivered service in order to make informed market based choices among competing offerings of such emerging communications technologies.”

46-5-220.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Competitive Emerging Communications Technologies Act of 2006.”

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-220

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 641, § 2/SB 120.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, Code Section 46-5-200, as enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 641, § 2/SB 120, was redesignated as Code Section 46-5-220.

Cross references.

Achieving Connectivity Everywhere (ACE) Act, §

36-70-6

.

46-5-221.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Broadband service” means a service that consists of the capability to transmit at a rate not less than 200 kilobits per second in either the upstream or downstream direction and in combination with such service provide either:

Access to the Internet; or

Computer processing, information storage, or protocol conversion.

For the purposes of this article, broadband service does not include any information content or service applications provided over such access service nor any intrastate service that was subject to a tariff in effect as of September 1, 2005.

“VoIP” means Voice over Internet Protocol services offering real-time multidirectional voice functionality utilizing any Internet protocol.

“Wireless service” means commercial mobile radio service carried on between mobile stations or receivers and land stations and by mobile stations communicating among themselves.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-221

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 641, § 2/SB 120; Ga. L. 2007, p. 318, § 3/HB 394; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 46/HB 79.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “Voice over Internet Protocol” for “voice over Internet protocol” at the beginning of paragraph (2).

The 2013 amendment,

effective April 24, 2013, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the middle of paragraph (2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, Code Section 46-5-201, as enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 641, § 2/SB 120, was redesignated as Code Section 46-5-221.

46-5-222.
Commission has no authority over setting of rates or terms and conditions for the offering of broadband service, voice over Internet protocol, or wireless service; limitations.

The Public Service Commission shall not have any jurisdiction, right, power, authority, or duty to impose any requirement or regulation relating to the setting of rates or terms and conditions for the offering of broadband service, VoIP, or wireless services.

This Code section shall not be construed to affect:

State laws of general applicability to all businesses, including, without limitation, consumer protection laws and laws relating to restraint of trade;

Any authority of the Public Service Commission with regard to consumer complaints; or

Any authority of the Public Service Commission to act in accordance with federal laws or regulations of the Federal Communications Commission, including, without limitation, jurisdiction granted to set rates, terms, and conditions for access to unbundled network elements and to arbitrate and enforce interconnection agreements.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this Code section, nothing in this Code section shall be construed to restrict or expand any other authority or jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-5-222

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 641, § 2/SB 120; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 5/HB 168.

The 2010 amendment,

effective June 4, 2010, substituted “services” for “service” at the end of subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, Code Section 46-5-202, as enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 641, § 2/SB 120, was redesignated as Code Section 46-5-222.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1) Update and modernize Georgia’s telecommunications laws to encourage competition and bring about lower prices and better services for the consumer;

“(2) Make Georgia a more attractive place for telecommunications investment and encourage the deployment of advanced technologies;

“(3) Create and preserve jobs for Georgia workers; and

“(4) Reduce the subsidies paid by Georgia consumers.

“It is not the intent of the General Assembly to impose any fee or other charge on Georgia consumers.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1135, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known as and may be cited as the ‘Telecom Jobs and Investment Act.’”